Nebraska, session 109, LB1054.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1054 LB1054
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $250,000 from the General
Fund for FY2026-27 to the State Department of Education to be used to
develop and administer a program to provide grants to school districts,
educational service units, and approved or accredited private,
denominational, or parochial schools for the purchase of cybersecurity
products and services.
-2-